da: Type graviditetspanel: Justerbar linning; Linning med snoretræk; Elastisk linning; Nedfoldeligt panel; Intet panel; Panel over maven; Strækpaneler i siden; Smoklinning; Linning under maven; Yogalinning; Andet
fr: Type d’empiècement de maternité: Taille ajustable; Taille à cordon de serrage; Taille élastique; Bandeau à rabattre; Sans bandeau; Bandeau sur le ventre; Empiècements extensibles sur les côtés; Taille smockée; Taille sous le ventre; Taille yoga; Autre
pl: Typ panelu ciążowego: Regulowany pas; Pas ze sznurkiem; Elastyczny pas; Wykładany panel; Brak panelu; Panel na brzuch; Elastyczne panele boczne; Marszczony pas; Pas pod brzuchem; Pas do jogi; Inne
sv: Typ av mödravårdspanel: Justerbar midja; Midja med dragsko; Elastisk midja; Nedvikbar panel; Ingen panel; Panel över magen; Stretchpaneler i sidan; Smockad midja; Midjeband under magen; Yogamidjeband; Annat
it: Tipo di pannello premaman: Fascia in vita regolabile; Fascia in vita con coulisse; Fascia in vita elastica; Pannello con risvolto; Senza pannello; Pannello sopra il pancione; Pannelli elasticizzati laterali; Fascia in vita a nido d'ape; Fascia in vita sotto il pancione; Fascia in vita yoga; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de painel de maternidade: Cós ajustável; Cós com cordão; Cós elástico; Painel dobrável; Sem painel; Painel sobre a barriga; Painéis laterais elásticos; Cós franzido; Cós sob a barriga; Cós tipo yoga; Outro
lt-LT: Nėščiųjų panelės tipas: Reguliuojamas juosmuo; Raišteliais sutraukiamas juosmuo; Elastinis juosmuo; Užlenkiamas juosmuo; Be skydelio; Skydelis virš pilvo; Šoniniai tamprūs skydeliai; Rauktas juosmuo; Juosmuo po pilvu; Jogos stiliaus juosmuo; Kita
ko: 임산부용 패널 유형: 조절형 허리 밴드; 드로스트링 허리 밴드; 신축성 허리 밴드; 접이식 패널; 패널 없음; 오버 밸리 패널; 측면 스트레치 패널; 스모킹 허리 밴드; 언더 밸리 허리 밴드; 요가 허리 밴드; 기타
es: Tipo de panel de maternidad: Cintura ajustable; Cintura con cordón; Cintura elástica; Panel plegable; Sin panel; Panel sobre el vientre; Paneles elásticos laterales; Cintura fruncida; Cintura bajo el vientre; Cintura estilo yoga; Otro
hu: Kismamapanel típusa: Állítható derékrész; Megkötős derékrész; Rugalmas derékrész; Lehajtható panel; Panel nélkül; Pocakot fedő panel; Oldalsó rugalmas betétek; Darázsolt derékrész; Pocak alatti derékrész; Jóga derékrész; Egyéb
vi: Loại bảng xét nghiệm thai sản: Cạp quần điều chỉnh được; Cạp quần có dây rút; Cạp quần co giãn; Phần bụng gấp; Không có phần bụng; Phần bụng che phủ toàn bộ; Phần co giãn hai bên; Cạp quần may nhún; Cạp quần dưới bụng; Cạp quần yoga; Khác
nl: Zwangerschapspaneel type: Verstelbare tailleband; Tailleband met trekkoord; Elastische tailleband; Omslagpaneel; Geen paneel; Over-de-buik-paneel; Stretchpanelen aan zijkant; Gesmockte tailleband; Tailleband onder de buik; Yoga-tailleband; Overige
bg-BG: Тип панел за бременни: Регулируем колан; Колан с връзка; Еластичен колан; Прегъващ се панел; Без панел; Панел над корема; Странични еластични панели; Набран колан; Колан под корема; Йога колан; Друго
pt-BR: Painel de maternidade tipo: Cós ajustável; Cós com cordão; Cós elástico; Painel dobrável; Sem painel; Painel sobre a barriga; Painéis elásticos laterais; Cós franzido; Cós sob a barriga; Cós de ioga; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta panela za trudnice: Prilagodljiva pasica; Pasica s vezicom; Elastična pasica; Preklopna traka; Bez trake; Traka preko trbuha; Bočne rastezljive trake; Nabrana pasica; Pasica ispod trbuha; Yoga pasica; Ostalo
zh-TW: 孕婦裝腹部面板類型: 可調式褲頭; 抽繩褲頭; 彈性褲頭; 反摺托腹布; 無托腹布; 全包覆托腹布; 側邊彈性布; 抓皺褲頭; 低腰托腹褲頭; 瑜珈褲頭; 其他
fi: Raskausajan tukipaneelin tyyppi: Säädettävä vyötärönauha; Kiristysnauhallinen vyötärö; Joustava vyötärönauha; Käännettävä paneeli; Ei paneelia; Vatsan yli menevä paneeli; Joustavat sivupaneelit; Rypytetty vyötärönauha; Vatsan alle jäävä vyötärönauha; Joogavyötärö; Muu
de: Typ des Umstandseinsatzes: Verstellbarer Bund; Kordelzugbund; Elastischer Bund; Umschlagbund; Kein Einsatz; Überbaucheinsatz; Stretcheinsätze an der Seite; Gesmokter Bund; Unterbauchbund; Yogabund; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทแผงสำหรับคุณแม่: ขอบเอวปรับได้; ขอบเอวรูดเชือก; ขอบเอวยางยืด; แถบพับทบ; ไม่มีแถบผ้า; แถบผ้าคลุมท้อง; แถบผ้ายืดด้านข้าง; ขอบเอวสม็อค; ขอบเอวใต้ท้อง; ขอบเอวโยคะ; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ελαστικής ζώνης εγκυμοσύνης: Ρυθμιζόμενη ζώνη; Ζώνη με κορδόνι; Ελαστική ζώνη; Αναδιπλούμενη φάσα; Χωρίς φάσα; Φάσα πάνω από την κοιλιά; Πλαϊνές ελαστικές φάσες; Ζώνη με σφηκοφωλιά; Ζώνη κάτω από την κοιλιά; Ζώνη yoga; Άλλο
cs: Typ panelu pro těhotné: Nastavitelný pas; Pas na stahovací šňůrku; Elastický pas; Ohrnovací panel; Bez panelu; Panel přes bříško; Boční strečové panely; Žabičkový pas; Pas pod bříško; Jógový pas; Jiné
tr: Hamilelik paneli tipi: Ayarlanabilir bel bandı; İpli bel bandı; Lastikli bel bandı; Katlanır panel; Panel yok; Göbek üstü panel; Yan esnek paneller; Büzgülü bel bandı; Göbek altı bel bandı; Yoga bel bandı; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul panoului pentru sarcină: Talie ajustabilă; Talie cu șnur; Talie elastică; Panou pliabil; Fără panou; Panou peste burtă; Panouri elastice laterale; Talie încrețită; Talie sub burtă; Talie de yoga; Altele
sk-SK: Typ tehotenského panelu: Nastaviteľný pás; Pás so sťahovacou šnúrkou; Elastický pás; Prehŕňací panel; Bez panela; Panel nad brucho; Bočné elastické panely; Žabkovaný pás; Pás pod brucho; Joga pás; Iný
zh-CN: 孕妇装面板类型: 可调节腰带; 抽绳腰带; 弹力腰带; 折叠托腹; 无托腹; 全包托腹; 侧边弹力托腹; 缩褶腰带; 低腰托腹腰带; 瑜伽腰带; 其他
ru: Тип вставки для беременных: Регулируемый пояс; Пояс на шнурке; Эластичный пояс; Отворачивающаяся вставка; Без вставки; Вставка на весь живот; Боковые эластичные вставки; Пояс со сборкой; Пояс под животом; Пояс для йоги; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta nosečniškega vložka: Prilagodljiv pas; Pas z vrvico; Elastičen pas; Preklopni pas; Brez pasu; Pas čez trebuh; Stranski raztegljivi vstavki; Nabrani pas; Pas pod trebuhom; Joga pas; Drugo
en: Maternity panel type: Adjustable waistband; Drawstring waistband; Elastic waistband; Foldover panel; No panel; Over-belly panel; Side stretch panels; Smocked waistband; Under-belly waistband; Yoga waistband; Other
nb: Type gravidpanel: Justerbar linning; Snøring i linningen; Elastisk linning; Nedbrettbart panel; Uten panel; Panel over magen; Strekkpaneler på siden; Rynket linning; Linning under magen; Yogalinning; Annet
ja: 産科パネルタイプ: 調節可能なウエストバンド; ドローストリングウエストバンド; 伸縮性ウエストバンド; 折り返しパネル; パネルなし; オーバーベリーパネル; サイドストレッチパネル; スモックウエストバンド; アンダーベリーウエストバンド; ヨガウエストバンド; その他